Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1042.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 11 of Title 61 of the Pennsylvania <--<--<--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 1102(B) OF TITLE 18 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED TO READ:§ 1102. SENTENCE FOR MURDER, MURDER OF UNBORN CHILD AND MURDER OF LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER.* * *(B) SECOND DEGREE.--EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SECTION 1102.1, A PERSON WHO HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF [MURDER OF THE SECOND DEGREE, OF] SECOND DEGREE MURDER OF AN UNBORN CHILD OR OF SECOND DEGREE MURDER OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SHALL BE SENTENCED TO A TERM OF LIFE IMPRISONMENT.* * *SECTION 2. TITLE 18 IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:§ 1102.2. SENTENCE FOR MURDER OF THE SECOND DEGREE.(A) SENTENCING.--EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C), A DEFENDANT WHO HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF MURDER OF THE SECOND DEGREE AND WHO WAS 18 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER AT THE TIME OF THE COMMISSION OF THE OFFENSE SHALL BE SENTENCED TO A TERM OF IMPRISONMENT, THE MINIMUM OF WHICH SHALL BE FIXED BY THE COURT AT NOT LESS THAN 35 YEARS AND THE MAXIMUM OF WHICH MAY NOT EXCEED LIFE IMPRISONMENT.(B) LIFE WITHOUT PAROLE.--(1) THE COURT MAY SENTENCE A DEFENDANT WHO HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF MURDER OF THE SECOND DEGREE AND WHO WAS 18 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER AT THE TIME OF THE COMMISSION OF THE OFFENSE TO LIFE IMPRISONMENT WITHOUT PAROLE IF THE FINDER OF FACT DETERMINES BEYOND A REASONABLE DOUBT THAT:(I) THE DEFENDANT KILLED, ATTEMPTED TO KILL OR INTENDED TO KILL THE VICTIM; AND(II) AT LEAST ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:20250HB1042PN3766 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) THE VICTIM WAS A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER OR A CHILD UNDER 13 YEARS OF AGE;(B) DURING THE COMMISSION OF THE OFFENSE, THE DEFENDANT ENGAGED AS A PRINCIPAL IN A VIOLATION OF SECTION 3121 (RELATING TO RAPE) OR 3123 (RELATING TO INVOLUNTARY DEVIATE SEXUAL INTERCOURSE);(C) THE DEFENDANT WAS PREVIOUSLY CONVICTED OF A CRIME OF VIOLENCE; OR(D) IN ADDITION TO A VICTIM DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I), THE DEFENDANT CAUSED SERIOUS BODILY INJURY OR DEATH TO ANOTHER VICTIM DURING THE COMMISSION OF THE OFFENSE.(2) THE COMMONWEALTH SHALL PROVIDE REASONABLE NOTICE TO THE DEFENDANT OF ITS INTENTION TO SEEK A SENTENCE OF LIFE IMPRISONMENT WITHOUT PAROLE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION. THE NOTICE SHALL BE PROVIDED BY SPECIFICALLY ALLEGING IN THE CHARGING DOCUMENT ANY FACT AUTHORIZING A LIFE WITHOUT PAROLE SENTENCE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1).(C) SENTENCING MITIGATION.--(1) A DEFENDANT WHO HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF MURDER OF THE SECOND DEGREE AND WHO WAS 18 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER AT THE TIME OF THE COMMISSION OF THE OFFENSE MAY BE SENTENCED TO A MINIMUM TERM OF IMPRISONMENT OF LESS THAN 35 YEARS, BUT NOT LESS THAN 10 YEARS, AND THE MAXIMUM OF WHICH MAY NOT EXCEED 40 YEARS, IF THE DEFENDANT PROVES AT SENTENCING BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE, AND THE COURT SPECIFICALLY FINDS, ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) THE DEFENDANT WAS NOT THE ONLY PARTICIPANT IN THE COMMISSION OF THE OFFENSE.(II) THE DEFENDANT DID NOT SOLICIT, REQUEST, 20250HB1042PN3766 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CONSPIRE, COMMAND, PLAN OR FURTHER AID ANOTHER TO CAUSE THE VICTIM'S DEATH.(III) THE DEFENDANT DID NOT BRANDISH, USE OR THREATEN TO USE A DEADLY WEAPON IN THE COMMISSION OF THE OFFENSE.(IV) THE DEFENDANT HAD NO REASON TO BELIEVE THAT ANY OTHER PARTICIPANT WOULD USE A DEADLY WEAPON.(V) THE DEFENDANT HAD NO REASON TO BELIEVE THAT ANY OTHER PARTICIPANT INTENDED TO ENGAGE IN CONDUCT LIKELY TO RESULT IN DEATH OR SERIOUS BODILY INJURY TO ANY PERSON.(VI) THE DEFENDANT DID NOT CAUSE SERIOUS BODILY INJURY TO ANOTHER DURING THE COMMISSION OF THE OFFENSE.(2) THIS SUBSECTION SHALL NOT APPLY TO A DEFENDANT WHEN, UNDER SUBSECTION (B), ANY OF THE FACTORS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B)(1) HAVE BEEN FOUND BEYOND A REASONABLE DOUBT.(3) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE INTERPRETED TO AUTHORIZE THE COURT TO OVERRIDE OR OTHERWISE CONTRADICT A JURY'S SPECIFIC FINDING REGARDING WHETHER A FACT DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) WAS PROVEN BEYOND A REASONABLE DOUBT.(D) CULPABILITY ASSESSMENT.--IN DECIDING THE TERM OF INCARCERATION TO IMPOSE, THE COURT MAY CONSIDER ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) THE IMPACT OF THE OFFENSE ON EACH VICTIM, INCLUDING ORAL AND WRITTEN VICTIM IMPACT STATEMENTS MADE OR SUBMITTED BY FAMILY MEMBERS OF THE VICTIM DETAILING THE PHYSICAL, PSYCHOLOGICAL AND ECONOMIC EFFECTS OF THE CRIME ON THE VICTIM AND THE VICTIM'S FAMILY. A VICTIM IMPACT STATEMENT MAY INCLUDE COMMENT ON THE SENTENCE OF THE DEFENDANT.(2) THE IMPACT OF THE OFFENSE ON THE COMMUNITY.(3) THE THREAT TO THE SAFETY OF THE PUBLIC OR ANY 20250HB1042PN3766 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INDIVIDUAL POSED BY THE DEFENDANT.(4) THE NATURE AND CIRCUMSTANCES OF THE OFFENSE COMMITTED BY THE DEFENDANT.(5) THE DEGREE OF THE DEFENDANT'S CULPABILITY.(6) GUIDELINES FOR SENTENCING AND RESENTENCING ADOPTED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA COMMISSION ON SENTENCING.(7) CHARACTERISTICS OF THE DEFENDANT, INCLUDING:(I) AGE.(II) MENTAL CAPACITY.(III) MATURITY.(IV) THE DEGREE OF CRIMINAL SOPHISTICATION EXHIBITED BY THE DEFENDANT.(V) THE NATURE AND EXTENT OF ANY PRIOR DELINQUENT OR CRIMINAL HISTORY, INCLUDING THE SUCCESS OR FAILURE OF ANY PREVIOUS ATTEMPTS BY THE COURT TO REHABILITATE THE DEFENDANT.(VI) PROBATION OR INSTITUTIONAL REPORTS.(8) OTHER RELEVANT FACTORS.(E) SENTENCING GUIDELINES.--(1) THE PENNSYLVANIA COMMISSION ON SENTENCING SHALL FOLLOW THE PUBLICATION PROCESS UNDER 42 PA.C.S. § 2155 (RELATING TO PUBLICATION OF GUIDELINES FOR SENTENCING, RESENTENCING AND PAROLE, RISK ASSESSMENT INSTRUMENT AND RECOMMITMENT RANGES FOLLOWING REVOCATION) FOR THE PROPOSAL OF ALL SENTENCING GUIDELINES UNDER THIS SECTION.(2) SENTENCING GUIDELINES PUBLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL CONSIDER THE VARYING DEGREES OF CULPABILITY OF A DEFENDANT AND THE NATURE OF THE CIRCUMSTANCES OF AN OFFENSE.(3) SENTENCING GUIDELINES MAY NOT SUPERSEDE THE MANDATORY SENTENCES PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION.20250HB1042PN3766 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) WITHIN 60 DAYS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PENNSYLVANIA COMMISSION ON SENTENCING SHALL BEGIN THE PUBLICATION PROCESS UNDER 42 PA.C.S. § 2155.(F) DEFINITIONS.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"CRIME OF VIOLENCE." AS DEFINED IN 42 PA.C.S. § 9714(G)(RELATING TO SENTENCES FOR SECOND AND SUBSEQUENT OFFENSES)."DEADLY WEAPON." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 2301 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS)."PRINCIPAL." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 2502(D) (RELATING TO MURDER)."SERIOUS BODILY INJURY." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 2301.SECTION 3. SECTIONS 9714(G) AND 9715(A) OF TITLE 42 ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 9714. SENTENCES FOR SECOND AND SUBSEQUENT OFFENSES.* * *(G) DEFINITION.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "CRIME OF VIOLENCE" MEANS MURDER OF THE SECOND DEGREE OR THE THIRD DEGREE, VOLUNTARY MANSLAUGHTER, MANSLAUGHTER OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER AS DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 2507(C) OR (D) (RELATING TO CRIMINAL HOMICIDE OF LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER), MURDER OF THE THIRD DEGREE INVOLVING AN UNBORN CHILD AS DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 2604(C) (RELATING TO MURDER OF UNBORN CHILD), AGGRAVATED ASSAULT OF AN UNBORN CHILD AS DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 2606 (RELATING TO AGGRAVATED ASSAULT OF UNBORN CHILD), AGGRAVATED ASSAULT AS DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 2702(A)(1) OR (2) (RELATING TO AGGRAVATED ASSAULT), ASSAULT OF LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER AS DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 2702.1(A)(1) (RELATING TO ASSAULT OF LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER), USE OF WEAPONS OF MASS DESTRUCTION AS 20250HB1042PN3766 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 2716(B) (RELATING TO WEAPONS OF MASS DESTRUCTION), TERRORISM AS DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 2717(B)(2) (RELATING TO TERRORISM), STRANGULATION WHEN THE OFFENSE IS GRADED AS A FELONY AS DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 2718 (RELATING TO STRANGULATION), TRAFFICKING OF PERSONS WHEN THE OFFENSE IS GRADED AS A FELONY OF THE FIRST DEGREE AS PROVIDED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 3011 (RELATING TO TRAFFICKING IN INDIVIDUALS), RAPE, INVOLUNTARY DEVIATE SEXUAL INTERCOURSE, AGGRAVATED INDECENT ASSAULT, INCEST, SEXUAL ASSAULT, ARSON ENDANGERING PERSONS OR AGGRAVATED ARSON AS DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 3301(A) OR (A.1) (RELATING TO ARSON AND RELATED OFFENSES), ECOTERRORISM AS CLASSIFIED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 3311(B)(3) (RELATING TO ECOTERRORISM), KIDNAPPING, BURGLARY AS DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 3502(A)(1) (RELATING TO BURGLARY), ROBBERY AS DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 3701(A)(1)(I), (II) OR (III) (RELATING TO ROBBERY), OR ROBBERY OF A MOTOR VEHICLE, DRUG DELIVERY RESULTING IN DEATH AS DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 2506(A) (RELATING TO DRUG DELIVERY RESULTING IN DEATH), OR CRIMINAL ATTEMPT, CRIMINAL CONSPIRACY OR CRIMINAL SOLICITATION TO COMMIT MURDER OR ANY OF THE OFFENSES LISTED ABOVE, OR AN EQUIVALENT CRIME UNDER THE LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH IN EFFECT AT THE TIME OF THE COMMISSION OF THAT OFFENSE OR AN EQUIVALENT CRIME IN ANOTHER JURISDICTION.§ 9715. LIFE IMPRISONMENT FOR HOMICIDE.(A) MANDATORY LIFE IMPRISONMENT.--NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF SECTION 9712 (RELATING TO SENTENCES FOR OFFENSES COMMITTED WITH FIREARMS), 9713 (RELATING TO SENTENCES FOR OFFENSES COMMITTED ON PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION) OR 9714 (RELATING TO SENTENCES FOR SECOND AND SUBSEQUENT OFFENSES), ANY PERSON CONVICTED OF MURDER OF THE SECOND DEGREE OR MURDER OF THE THIRD DEGREE IN THIS COMMONWEALTH WHO HAS PREVIOUSLY BEEN CONVICTED AT 20250HB1042PN3766 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ANY TIME OF MURDER OR VOLUNTARY MANSLAUGHTER IN THIS COMMONWEALTH OR OF THE SAME OR SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT CRIME IN ANY OTHER JURISDICTION SHALL BE SENTENCED TO LIFE IMPRISONMENT, NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS TITLE OR OTHER STATUTE TO THE CONTRARY.* * *SECTION 4. CHAPTER 11 OF TITLE 61 IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBCHAPTER TO READ:SUBCHAPTER EEARNED VOCATIONAL TRAINING AND EDUCATION CREDITSec.1181. Scope and purpose of subchapter.1182. Earned vocational training and education credit.1183. Rules and regulations.1184. Construction.§ 1181. Scope and purpose of subchapter.This subchapter relates to earned vocational training and education credits. This subchapter seeks to encourage inmate participation and completion of inmate vocational training and education programs for the purposes of improving public safety outcomes.§ 1182. Earned vocational training and education credit.(a) Training and credit.--Except as provided under this section, an inmate sentenced on or after the effective date of this section and committed to the department shall earn vocational training and education credit toward reduction of an aggregate minimum sentence according to the following schedule: (1) Up to 90 days for completing a vocational program as determined by the department.(2) UP TO 120 days for attaining a general education 20250HB1042PN3766 - 8 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 development or high school diploma.(3) Up to 90 days for completing a course offered from an institution of higher education, as determined by the department.(4) UP TO 180 days for attaining a degree from an institution of higher education.(b) Limitation.--An inmate may not earn vocational training and education credits under subsection (a) in excess of one-fourth of the inmate's minimum sentence. Credits earned shall not be applied until the inmate has completed programming required by the department . Credits shall not be applied if the inmate has less than nine months to serve before parole eligibility.(c) Exclusions.--An inmate sentenced for a conviction of any of the following OR SENTENCED FOR A CONVICTION OF CRIMINAL ATTEMPT OF, CRIMINAL SOLICITATION OF OR CRIMINAL CONSPIRACY TO COMMIT ANY OF THE FOLLOWING may not earn vocational training and education credits under subsection (a):(1) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502 (relating to murder). AN OFFENSE UNDER 18 PA.C.S. CH. 25 (RELATING TO CRIMINAL HOMICIDE).(2) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2507 (relating to criminal homicide of law enforcement officer).(3) (2) An offense requiring registration under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 97 Subch. H (relating to registration of sexual offenders) or I (relating to continued registration of sexual offenders) UNDER 42 PA.C.S. § 9799.14 (RELATING TO SEXUAL OFFENSES AND TIER SYSTEM) . (4) (i) (3) A second or subsequent crime of violence as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714(g) (relating to sentences for second and subsequent offenses) . 20250HB1042PN3766 - 9 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Criminal attempt, criminal solicitation or criminal conspiracy to commit a crime of violence as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714(g) or an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction. OR AN EQUIVALENT CRIME IN ANOTHER JURISDICTION.(c.1) Misconduct.--A person shall not be eligible for earned vocational and education credits under subsection (a) if the person has been found guilty of a major disciplinary infraction involving drugs, violence or a sexual act after the effective date of this subsection DURING THE SENTENCE THAT THE PERSON IS SERVING . (d) Parole.--The board may exercise its power to parole an inmate at the expiration of the minimum term of imprisonment fixed by the sentencing court less any earned vocational training and education credits as provided under this subchapter.(e) Notice.--Eligibility for earned vocational training and education credits shall be considered an element of the disposition and sentence for the purposes of notice requirements under section 213(f) of the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the Crime Victims Act.(F) CREDIT CONSIDERATION.--EARNING VOCATIONAL TRAINING AND EDUCATION CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBCHAPTER SHALL BE CONSIDERED EDUCATION AND TRAINING ACTIVITIES FOR THE PURPOSES OF AN INDIVIDUALIZED ASSESSMENT UNDER 63 PA.C.S. § 3113(C)(6) (RELATING TO CONSIDERATION OF CRIMINAL CONVICTIONS).§ 1183. Rules and regulations.The department and board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as deemed necessary to implement and administer this subchapter.20250HB1042PN3766 - 10 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 1184. Construction.(a) Construction.--This chapter shall not be construed to confer any legal right upon an individual to:(1) Participate in an earned vocational training or education credit program.(2) Continue participation in an earned vocational training or education credit program.(3) File a cause of action in any court to challenge the department's determination regarding participation or completion of any earned vocational training or education credit program.(b) (Reserved).SECTION 5. THE DEFINITION OF "ELIGIBLE INMATE" IN SECTION 3903 OF TITLE 61 IS AMENDED TO READ:§ 3903. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS CHAPTER SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:* * *"ELIGIBLE INMATE." A PERSON SENTENCED TO A TERM OF CONFINEMENT UNDER THE JURISDICTION OF THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS WHO IS SERVING A TERM OF CONFINEMENT, THE MINIMUM OF WHICH IS NOT MORE THAN TWO YEARS AND THE MAXIMUM OF WHICH IS FIVE YEARS OR LESS, OR AN INMATE WHO IS SERVING A TERM OF CONFINEMENT, THE MINIMUM OF WHICH IS NOT MORE THAN THREE YEARS WHERE THAT INMATE IS WITHIN TWO YEARS OF COMPLETING HIS MINIMUM TERM, AND WHO HAS NOT REACHED 40 YEARS OF AGE AT THE TIME HE IS APPROVED FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE MOTIVATIONAL BOOT CAMP PROGRAM. THE TERM SHALL NOT INCLUDE ANY INMATE WHO IS SUBJECT TO A SENTENCE THE CALCULATION OF WHICH INCLUDED AN ENHANCEMENT FOR 20250HB1042PN3766 - 11 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE USE OF A DEADLY WEAPON AS DEFINED PURSUANT TO THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES PROMULGATED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA COMMISSION ON SENTENCING, ANY INMATE WHO HAS BEEN CONVICTED OR ADJUDICATED DELINQUENT OF ANY CRIME LISTED UNDER 42 PA.C.S. CH. 97 SUBCH. H (RELATING TO REGISTRATION OF SEXUAL OFFENDERS) OR I (RELATING TO CONTINUED REGISTRATION OF SEXUAL OFFENDERS) OR ANY INMATE WITH A CURRENT CONVICTION OR A PRIOR CONVICTION WITHIN THE PAST TEN YEARS FOR 18 PA.C.S. § 2502 (RELATING TO MURDER), DRUG TRAFFICKING AS DEFINED IN SECTION 4103 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS) OR A CRIME OF VIOLENCE AS DEFINED IN 42 PA.C.S. § 9714(G) (RELATING TO SENTENCES FOR SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSES) OR WHO HAS EVER BEEN CONVICTED OF MURDER OF THE SECOND DEGREE OR CRIMINAL ATTEMPT, CRIMINAL SOLICITATION OR CRIMINAL CONSPIRACY TO COMMIT ANY OF THESE OFFENSES.* * *Section 2 6. Sections 6137(a)(3) and (3.1)(i) and (g)(2), (2.1), (4) introductory paragraph and (5) and 6137.1(b) of Title 61 are amended to read:§ 6137. Parole power.(a) General criteria for parole.--* * *(3) The power to parole granted under this section to the board may not be exercised in the board's discretion at any time before, but only after, the expiration of the minimum term of imprisonment fixed by the court in its sentence, less any vocational training and education credits under Subchapter E of Chapter 11 (relating to earned vocational training and education credit), or by the Board of Pardons in a sentence which has been reduced by commutation.(3.1) (i) Following the expiration of the offender's 20250HB1042PN3766 - 12 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 minimum term of imprisonment, less any vocational training and education credits under Subchapter E of Chapter 11, if the primary reason for not paroling the offender is the offender's inability to access and complete prescribed programming within the correctional institution, the board may release the offender on parole with the condition that the offender complete the prescribed programming while on parole.* * *(g) Procedures for Recidivism Risk Reduction Incentive.--* * *(2) Upon identification of an inmate as an eligible offender, as defined under section 4503 (relating to definitions), the department shall send notice to the board. The board shall send notice to the prosecuting attorney and the court no less than six months before the expiration of the offender's minimum sentence or the inmate's minimum sentence less any vocational training and educational credits under Subchapter E of Chapter 11, whichever occurs first, indicating that the department has preliminarily identified the offender as an eligible offender. The notice shall be sent by United States mail unless the board, the court and the prosecutor have consented to receipt of notice via electronic means. For offenders committed to the department whose expiration of the minimum sentence is six months or less from the date of admission, the department shall give prompt notice.(2.1) The department shall provide the board all information related to the offender's adjustment while incarcerated, misconducts, if any, information related to 20250HB1042PN3766 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 programming and treatment, including success, completion or failure to complete, any vocational training and education credit earned under Subchapter E of Chapter 11, or any other information the department deems relevant. The board shall send such information to the prosecuting attorney and to the court no less than six months before the expiration of the offender's minimum sentence. The notice may be sent electronically. For offenders committed to the department whose expiration of the minimum sentence is six months or less from the date of admission, such information shall be sent at the same time prompt notice under paragraph (2) is given.* * *(4) If no notice of objection has been filed under paragraph (3), the eligible offender shall be paroled at the minimum date, or the minimum date less any vocational training and education credits under Subchapter E of Chapter 11, whichever occurs first, upon a determination by the board or the board's designee that all of the following apply:* * *(5) If the court or prosecuting attorney files a timely objection under paragraph (3), the board shall make a determination as to whether the offender is an eligible offender. The board shall notify the department, prosecuting attorney and court of its determination no later than 30 days prior to the minimum parole date[.], or a minimum parole date less any earned vocational training and education credits under Subchapter E of Chapter 11, whichever occurs first. If the board determines that the offender is an eligible offender under this chapter, the board shall follow the 20250HB1042PN3766 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provisions under paragraph (4). If the board determines that the offender is not an eligible offender under section 4503 (relating to definitions), the board shall retain exclusive jurisdiction to grant parole and shall determine whether the offender should be paroled at the minimum date, less any earned vocational training and education credits under Subchapter E of Chapter 11, paroled at a later date or denied parole.* * *§ 6137.1. Short sentence parole.* * *(b) Approval of parole.--The board shall, without requiring an interview, approve for parole a person eligible for short sentence parole under this section at the expiration of the person's minimum date or recidivism risk reduction incentive minimum date, less any earned vocational training and education credits under Subchapter E of Chapter 11 (relating to earned vocational training and education credit), whichever is shorter. If the person was committed to the department after expiration of the person's minimum date, the board shall approve the person for parole within 30 days after commitment to the department.* * *Section 3. Section 3113(c)(6) and (e)(1) of Title 63 are amended to read:§ 3113. Consideration of criminal convictions.* * *(c) Individualized assessment.--A licensing board or licensing commission shall conduct an individualized assessment of the individual with respect to criminal convictions and rehabilitation. The licensing board or licensing commission 20250HB1042PN3766 - 15 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall only consider the following factors in order to determine whether the individual meets the requirements for issuance of a license, certificate, registration or permit under subsection (b)(1) or (b)(2):* * *(6) Successful completion of education and training activities, including those in a county correctional facility or the Department of Corrections, and earning of vocational training and education credits, if applicable.* * *(e) Crimes of violence.--An individual convicted of a crime of violence as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714 (relating to sentences for second and subsequent offenses) may be granted a license, registration, certificate or permit by a licensing board or licensing commission if all of the following apply:(1) If the individual was incarcerated, at least three years have elapsed since release from incarceration. The period of three years shall be tolled for a violation of parole. The period of three years under this paragraph shall be reduced by a period of time equal to any earned vocational training and education credits under 61 Pa.C.S. Ch. 11 Subch. E (relating to earned vocational training and education credit).* * *Section 4 3. This act shall take effect in one year.SECTION 7. TITLE 61 IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:§ 6137.3. PAROLE ELIGIBILITY FOR OFFENDERS SENTENCED TO LIFE FOR MURDER OF THE SECOND DEGREE.(A) PAROLE.--NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 6137(A) (RELATING TO PAROLE POWER), THE BOARD SHALL HAVE THE POWER TO PAROLE AN 20250HB1042PN3766 - 16 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OFFENDER WHO IS SERVING A SENTENCE OF LIFE IMPRISONMENT FOR A CONVICTION OF MURDER OF THE SECOND DEGREE THAT WAS IMPOSED PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION IF:(1) THE OFFENDER HAS SERVED AT LEAST 35 YEARS INCARCERATION OF THE LIFE SENTENCE; OR(2) THE OFFENDER IS 70 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER AND HAS SERVED AT LEAST 20 YEARS INCARCERATION OF THE LIFE SENTENCE.(B) EXCLUSIONS.--SUBSECTION (A)(1) SHALL NOT APPLY TO AN OFFENDER CONVICTED OF MURDER OF THE SECOND DEGREE WHO:(1) WAS SENTENCED TO LIFE IMPRISONMENT WITHOUT PAROLE UNDER 18 PA.C.S. § 1102.1 (RELATING TO SENTENCE OF PERSONS UNDER THE AGE OF 18 FOR MURDER, MURDER OF AN UNBORN CHILD AND MURDER OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER);(2) WAS UNDER 18 YEARS OF AGE AT THE TIME OF THE COMMISSION OF THE OFFENSE AND WAS RESENTENCED TO LIFE IMPRISONMENT WITHOUT PAROLE AFTER JUNE 24, 2012;(3) KILLED, INTENDED TO KILL OR ATTEMPTED TO KILL A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER DURING THE COMMISSION OF THE OFFENSE; OR(4) PARTICIPATED IN THE PERPETRATION OF RAPE OR DEVIATE SEXUAL INTERCOURSE BY FORCE DURING THE COMMISSION OF THE OFFENSE.(C) BOARD CONSIDERATIONS.--IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER REQUIREMENT UNDER THIS CHAPTER, IN CONSIDERING WHETHER TO GRANT PAROLE TO AN OFFENDER MADE ELIGIBLE UNDER SUBSECTION (A), THE BOARD SHALL:(1) GIVE PRIMARY CONSIDERATION TO THE PROTECTION OF THE PUBLIC AND TO THE SAFETY OF THE VICTIM OR ANY OTHER PERSON.(2) CONSIDER THE NATURE AND CIRCUMSTANCES OF THE OFFENSE, INCLUDING:(I) THE DEGREE OF THE OFFENDER'S CULPABILITY IN THE 20250HB1042PN3766 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 VICTIM'S DEATH AND THE PERPETRATION OF THE UNDERLYING FELONY.(II) WHETHER THE OFFENDER CAUSED, INTENDED TO CAUSE OR ATTEMPTED TO CAUSE THE VICTIM'S DEATH.(III) ANY OTHER CIRCUMSTANCE THE BOARD DEEMS RELEVANT IN DECIDING WHETHER TO GRANT OR DENY PAROLE.(D) ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS.--(1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS CHAPTER, A MAJORITY OF THE BOARD SHALL BE REQUIRED TO MAKE DECISIONS REGARDING PAROLE UNDER THIS SECTION. ONLY BOARD MEMBERS SHALL VOTE ON WHETHER TO GRANT PAROLE UNDER THIS SECTION. PRIOR TO VOTING, EACH BOARD MEMBER SHALL REVIEW ANY VICTIM STATEMENT AND TESTIMONY PROVIDED UNDER SECTION 6140 (RELATING TO VICTIM STATEMENTS, TESTIMONY AND PARTICIPATION IN HEARING).(2) THE BOARD MAY NOT CONSIDER PAROLE IN ANY CASE WHERE THE BOARD OR THE OFFICE OF VICTIM ADVOCATE FAILS TO COMPLY WITH THE PROCEDURES SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION OR SECTION 6140.(E) LIMITATIONS.--(1) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION SHALL NOT AFFECT THE SENTENCE OR PAROLE ELIGIBILITY FOR ANY TERM OF IMPRISONMENT IMPOSED FOR A SEPARATE OFFENSE.(2) NOTHING UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE INTERPRETED AS GRANTING A RIGHT TO BE PAROLED TO ANY OFFENDER.(3) A DECISION BY THE BOARD RELATING TO AN OFFENDER WHO IS ELIGIBLE FOR PAROLE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OR SENTENCED UNDER 18 PA.C.S. § 1102.1 MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED AN ADJUDICATION UNDER 2 PA.C.S. CHS. 5 SUBCH. A (RELATING TO PRACTICE AND PROCEDURE OF COMMONWEALTH AGENCIES) AND 7 SUBCH. A (RELATING TO JUDICIAL REVIEW OF COMMONWEALTH AGENCY 20250HB1042PN3766 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ACTION).SECTION 8. SECTION 6139(A)(3.1) AND (3.2) OF TITLE 61 ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 6139. PAROLE PROCEDURE.(A) SPECIFIC REQUIREMENTS.--* * *(3.1) NOTWITHSTANDING PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3), THE BOARD SHALL NOT BE REQUIRED TO CONSIDER NOR TO DISPOSE OF AN APPLICATION BY AN OFFENDER OR AN OFFENDER'S ATTORNEY IN THE CASE OF AN OFFENDER WHO IS ELIGIBLE FOR PAROLE UNDER SECTION 6137.3(A) OR SENTENCED UNDER 18 PA.C.S. § 1102.1 (RELATING TO SENTENCE OF PERSONS UNDER THE AGE OF 18 FOR MURDER, MURDER OF AN UNBORN CHILD AND MURDER OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER) OR 18 PA.C.S. § 1102.2 (RELATING TO SENTENCE FOR MURDER OF THE SECOND DEGREE) IF A PAROLE DECISION HAS BEEN ISSUED BY THE BOARD WITHIN FIVE YEARS OF THE DATE OF THE CURRENT APPLICATION.(3.2) NOTHING UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE INTERPRETED AS GRANTING A RIGHT TO BE PAROLED TO ANY OFFENDER, AND A DECISION BY THE BOARD AND ITS DESIGNEES RELATING TO AN OFFENDER WHO IS ELIGIBLE FOR PAROLE UNDER SECTION 6137.3(A) OR SENTENCED UNDER 18 PA.C.S. § 1102.1 MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED AN ADJUDICATION UNDER 2 PA.C.S. CHS. 5 SUBCH. A (RELATING TO PRACTICE AND PROCEDURE OF COMMONWEALTH AGENCIES) AND 7 SUBCH. A (RELATING TO JUDICIAL REVIEW OF COMMONWEALTH AGENCY ACTION).* * *SECTION 9. SECTION 6140 OF TITLE 61 IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:§ 6140. VICTIM STATEMENTS, TESTIMONY AND PARTICIPATION IN 20250HB1042PN3766 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 HEARING.* * *(J) VICTIM NOTIFICATION FOR CASES UNDER SECTION 6137.3(A).--THIS SUBSECTION SHALL APPLY ONLY TO HEARINGS REGARDING THE PAROLE OF AN OFFENDER UNDER SECTION 6137.3(A)(1) (RELATING TO PAROLE ELIGIBILITY FOR OFFENDERS SENTENCED TO LIFE FOR MURDER OF THE SECOND DEGREE). THE FOLLOWING APPLY:(1) THE BOARD SHALL ENSURE THAT VICTIMS AND FAMILY MEMBERS HAVE A REASONABLE OPPORTUNITY TO BE HEARD AT ANY HEARING AUTHORIZED BY THIS SECTION. THE BOARD SHALL GIVE MEANINGFUL CONSIDERATION TO ANY TESTIMONY PRESENTED AT THE HEARING.(2) THE OFFICE OF VICTIM ADVOCATE SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE TO ANY VICTIM OR NEXT OF KIN, INCLUDING TO VICTIMS WHO ARE REGISTERED WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS, THE OFFICE OF VICTIM ADVOCATE AND THE PENNSYLVANIA PAROLE BOARD AND THOSE WHOSE WHEREABOUTS ARE OTHERWISE KNOWN.(3) THE OFFICE OF VICTIM ADVOCATE SHALL MAKE ALL REASONABLE EFFORTS TO EFFECTUATE NOTICE WITHIN 30 DAYS OF THE DATE THAT A HEARING IS GRANTED AND AT LEAST 60 DAYS PRIOR TO THE HEARING.(4) THE BOARD AND OFFICE OF VICTIM ADVOCATE SHALL MAKE EVERY REASONABLE EFFORT TO IDENTIFY, FIND AND NOTIFY VICTIMS WHO HAVE NOT REGISTERED WITH THE OFFICE OF VICTIM ADVOCATE.(5) THE BOARD AND THE OFFICE OF VICTIM ADVOCATE SHALL PROVIDE EACH BOARD MEMBER WITH WRITTEN NOTICE CONTAINING ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) THE DATE AND MANNER BY WHICH NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION WAS EFFECTUATED; OR(II) A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF ALL EFFORTS AND 20250HB1042PN3766 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 METHODS EMPLOYED TO IDENTIFY, LOCATE AND NOTIFY THE VICTIM OR NEXT OF KIN.(6) TO EFFECTUATE THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE BOARD SHALL ISSUE GUIDELINES WITHIN 90 DAYS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH.SECTION 10. IT IS THE INTENT OF THIS ACT TO REMEDY THE PENNSYLVANIA SUPREME COURT'S DECISION IN COMMONWEALTH V. LEE, 2026 WL 855614 (PA. MARCH 26, 2026).SECTION 11. THE ADDITION OF 18 PA.C.S. § 1102.2 SHALL APPLY TO:(1) OFFENSES COMMITTED ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH.(2) OFFENSES COMMITTED PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH FOR WHICH JUDGMENT OF SENTENCE HAS NOT YET BEEN IMPOSED.SECTION 12. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE FOLLOWING SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY:THE AMENDMENT OR ADDITION OF 18 PA.C.S. §§ 1102(B) AND 1102.2.THE AMENDMENT OF 42 PA.C.S. §§ 9714(G) AND 9715(A).THE AMENDMENT OF THE DEFINITION OF "ELIGIBLE INMATE" IN 61 PA.C.S. § 3903.THE AMENDMENT OR ADDITION OF 61 PA.C.S. §§ 6137.3, 6139(A)(3.1) AND (3.2) AND 6140(J).SECTIONS 10 AND 11 OF THIS ACT.THIS SECTION.(2) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN ONE YEAR.20250HB1042PN3766 - 21 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728